Utah statutes.
58-42a-401.   Denial of license -- Discipline.

The division may refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew the license of a licensee, revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and issue a cease and desist order under the grounds specified in Section 58-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 240, 1994 General Session

